California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) An entity providing private health care coverage, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 10020, shall do all of the following:

(1) Accept the state’s right of recovery and the assignment to the state
 of any right of an individual or other entity to payment from the party for an item or service for which payment has been made under the state plan, waivers granted in accordance with Section 1315 or 1396n of Title 42 of the United States Code, or through a Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101.

(2) Respond to an inquiry by the state or a provider, as defined in subdivision (o) of Section 14043.1, including a billing agent or a billing agent of the provider, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 14040.1, or a Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, regarding a claim for payment for a health care item or service that is submitted not later than three years after the date of the provision of that health care item or service.

(3) Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the state, a provider as defined in paragraph (2), or a Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or format of the claim form, or a failure to present proper documentation at the point-of-sale that is the basis of the claim, or in the case of a responsible third party, a failure to obtain a prior authorization for the item or service for which the claim is being submitted if both of the following occur:

(A) The claim is submitted by the state, a provider as defined in paragraph (2), or a Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, within the three-year period beginning on the date on which the
 item or service was furnished.

(B) An action by the state, a provider as defined in paragraph (2), or a Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, to enforce its rights with respect to that claim is commenced within six years of the state’s or provider’s submission of the claim.

(4) Request a refund of a claim paid in error no later than three years from the date the payment was made to the State Department of Health Care Services. The State Department of Health Care Services shall not refund a claim paid in error if the request for a refund is more than three years from the date the payment was made to the State Department of Health Care Services.

(5) Respond to a request for payment by the
 state, a provider as defined in paragraph (2), or a Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in paragraph (2), within 60 days by providing one of the following:

(A) Payment on the claim.

(B) A written request for additional information necessary to process the claim.

(C) A written explanation for the denial of the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 492, Sec. 16.   (SB 1511)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10024.

Every contract or agreement for private health care coverage entered into or renewed after January 1, 1972, is deemed to provide for payment to a publicly funded health care program for the actual cost that the program incurs in providing health care items or rendering health care services to any party or beneficiary of that contract or agreement to the extent of the benefits provided under the terms of the policy for the items provided or services rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 188, Sec. 34.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10025.

The state shall not reimburse any local government or any facility thereof, under Medi-Cal or under any other health program where the state pays part or all of the costs, for care provided to a person covered under any disability insurance, health insurance, or prepaid health plan.

In local programs fully or partially funded by the state, state participation shall be reduced in an amount proportionate to the cost of service provided to a person violating Section 10020.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 812.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Definitions [10050. - 10063.]

10050.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10051.

“Public social services” means those activities and functions of state and local government administered or supervised by the department or the State Department of Health Services and involved in providing aid or services or both, including health care services and medical assistance, to those people of the state who, because of their economic circumstances or social condition, are in need thereof and may benefit thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10052.

“Aid” means financial assistance provided to or in behalf of needy persons under the terms of this division, including direct money payments and vendor payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10053.

(a) “Services” means those activities and functions performed by social work staff and related personnel of the department and county departments with or in behalf of individuals or families, which are directed toward the improvement of the capabilities of the individuals or families maintaining or achieving a sound family life, rehabilitation, self-care, and economic independence.

(b) Services for children shall include the coordinated efforts of the State Departments of Social Services and Education to ensure that all children in receipt of aid under CalWORKs are afforded the opportunity to participate and progress under an educational program that will lead to their functioning at full capacity upon reaching maturity. The educational services aspect of public social services includes education for parents in food preparation and provision for nutritional supplements to the extent necessary and as authorized by Article 9 (commencing with Section 49510 of Chapter 9 of Part 27 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 700.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10053.25.

Funding of Sections 10053 and 14503 is subject to the provisions of Part 1.5 (commencing with Section 10100). The level of funding for Sections 14503 and 14504 shall not fall below the total amount appropriated for family planning services in the 1977–78 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 345.   Note: Conditions in Stats. 1978, Ch. 1235, Sec. 14, for repeal of this section failed.)
-------------------------------------------

10054.

“Department” means the State Department of Social Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10055.

“Director” means the Director of Social Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10056.

“Board” means the State Social Services Advisory Board. Whenever any reference is made in any provision of law to the “State Benefits and Services Advisory Board”, it shall mean the State Social Services Advisory Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10057.

“Board of supervisors” means the county board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10058.

“County department” means the county agency designated by the board of supervisors, or by such other authority as may be provided in the county charter, as responsible for the administration of public social services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10059.

“County director” means the director or other chief executive of the county department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10060.

“Regulations” includes but is not limited to standards of eligibility for aid and services, procedures necessary for the proper and efficient administration of public social services, and standards as to conditions which must be met by agencies or individuals subject to licensing or supervision by the department or the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10061.

“Public assistance” and “public assistance programs” refer to those public social services programs provided for in Part 3 of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

10062.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Department of Health Services and the Director of Health Services shall have those powers and duties conferred by state law upon the State Department of Social Services and its director as is necessary to carry out the purposes imposed on it by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

10063.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the name of the program provided for pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) is hereby changed to the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids program, referred to as CalWORKs.

(b) Any reference to the Aid to Families with Dependent Children Program, Family Group and Unemployment program, and the Greater Avenues for Independence program shall be deemed to refer to the CalWORKs program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 376.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Electronic Benefits Transfer Act [10065. - 10077.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [10065. - 10066.]

10065.

The Legislature finds and declares both of the following:

(a) The development of incompatible systems for electronic benefits transfer will create significant hardships on recipients of public social services and businesses that accept electronic transactions as payment for goods and services.

(b) The goals of electronic benefits transfer are to reduce the cost of delivering benefits to recipients, to ensure that all systems within California are compatible, and to afford public social services recipients the opportunity to better and more securely manage their financial affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 31.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative August 18, 1997, by Sec. 187 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

10066.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Committee” means the committee created pursuant to this chapter.

(b) “Benefits” means financial and food assistance provided to, or on behalf of, those Californians who, because of their economic circumstances or social condition, are in need thereof, and may benefit thereby.

(c) “System” means the electronic benefits transfer system developed pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 31.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative August 18, 1997, by Sec. 187 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Electronic Benefits Transfer Committee [10067. - 10071.]

10067.

The Electronic Benefits Transfer Committee is hereby created. The committee shall remain in existence until January 1, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 31.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative August 18, 1997, by Sec. 187 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

10068.

The committee shall consist of the Director of the Health and Welfare Agency Data Center, who shall be the chair of the committee, the Director of Social Services, the Director of Health Services, the Director of Information Technology, the Controller, the Treasurer, a representative of the California State Association of Counties, one member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, and one member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules. The committee shall provide for the participation of a technical advisory group comprised of representatives from the California Association of County Treasurers and Tax Collectors, the County Welfare Directors Association, the California Grocer’s Association, the California Retailer’s Association, the California Bankers Association, and agencies, organizations, and representatives of individuals who will use or be affected by an electronic benefits transfer system. A company or individual that participates in the committee or the advisory group shall not be eligible to bid for the provision of the electronic benefits transfer system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 31.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative August 18, 1997, by Sec. 187 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------

10069.

The committee shall advise the department on the development and implementation of a statewide electronic benefits transfer system, and shall provide advice concerning the request for proposal. The system shall have the capability to deliver CalFresh benefits and, upon the election of the county, benefits under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3. The system may also be used, with the approval of the department, for the distribution of other benefits. Any electronic benefits transfer processor shall be capable of implementing systems within nine months of contracting for services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 25.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10069.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the project management for a statewide electronic benefits transfer system shall be transferred from the department to the Health and Welfare Agency Data Center.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606, Sec. 18.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

10071.

Any benefits provided to recipients under the department’s authority may be distributed through the electronic benefits transfer system as long as the recipient has reasonable access to his or her benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 270, Sec. 31.   Effective August 11, 1997.   Operative August 18, 1997, by Sec. 187 of Ch. 270.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Systems Design [10072. - 10072.3.]

10072.

The electronic benefits transfer system required by this chapter shall be designed to do, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) To the extent permitted by federal law and the rules of the program providing the benefits, recipients who are required to receive their benefits using an electronic benefits transfer system shall be permitted to gain access to the benefits in any part of the state where electronic benefits transfers are accepted. All electronic benefits transfer systems in this state shall be designed to allow recipients to gain access to their benefits by using every other electronic benefits transfer system.

(b) To the maximum extent feasible, electronic benefits transfer systems shall be designed
 to be compatible with the electronic benefits transfer systems in other states.

(c) All reasonable measures shall be taken in order to ensure that recipients have access to electronically issued benefits through systems, including, but not limited to, automated teller machines, point-of-sale devices, or other devices that accept electronic benefits transfer transactions. Benefits provided under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 shall be staggered over a period of three calendar days, unless a county requests a waiver from the department and the waiver is approved, or in cases of hardship pursuant to subdivision (p).

(d) The system shall provide for reasonable access to benefits to recipients who demonstrate an inability to use an electronic benefits transfer card or other aspect of the system because of disability, language, lack of access, or other barrier.
 These alternative methods shall conform to the requirements of the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101, et seq.), including reasonable accommodations for recipients who, because of physical or mental disabilities, are unable to operate or otherwise make effective use of the electronic benefits transfer system.

(e) The system shall permit a recipient the option to choose a personal identification number, also known as a “PIN” number, to assist the recipient to remember their number in order to allow access to benefits. Whenever an institution, authorized representative, or other third party not part of the recipient household or assistance unit has been issued an electronic benefits transfer card, either in lieu of, or in addition to, the recipient, the third party shall have a separate card and personal identification number. At the option of the recipient, they may designate whether restrictions apply to the
 third party’s access to the recipient’s benefits. At the option of the recipient head of household or assistance unit, the county shall provide one electronic benefits transfer card to each adult member to enable them to access benefits.

(f) The system shall have a 24-hour per day toll-free telephone hotline for the reporting of lost or stolen cards that will provide recipients, at no additional cost to the recipient, with information on how to have the card and personal identification number replaced, and that will allow an authorized representative or head of household to access, over the telephone, the transaction history detail for at least the last 10 transactions and to request that the transaction history detail for at least the past two months be sent by mail.

(g) The system shall have an internet website that will provide recipients, at no additional cost to the
 recipient, with information on how to have the card and personal identification number replaced, and that will allow an authorized representative or head of household to view the transaction history detail for at least the last 10 transactions and to request that the transaction history detail for at least the past two months be sent by mail.

(h) In addition to the ability to receive transaction history detail pursuant to subdivisions (f) and (g), a county human services agency shall make available to an authorized representative or head of household, at no additional cost to the authorized representative or head of household, all electronic benefit transaction history details that are available to the county human services agency within 10 business days after a request has been received by the agency.

(i) (1) A recipient shall not incur any loss of
 electronic benefits after reporting that their electronic benefits transfer card or personal identification number has been lost or stolen. The system shall provide for the prompt replacement of lost or stolen electronic benefits transfer cards and personal identification numbers. Electronic benefits for which the case was determined eligible and that were not withdrawn by transactions using an authorized personal identification number for the account shall also be promptly replaced.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), a recipient shall not incur any loss of cash benefits that are taken by an unauthorized contact, withdrawal, removal, or use of benefits, including, but not limited to, use that results from an unauthorized solicitation, request, or representation that does not occur by the use of a physical electronic benefits transfer card issued to the recipient or authorized third party to directly access the
 benefits. Benefits taken as described in this subparagraph shall be promptly replaced in accordance with the protocol established by the department pursuant to paragraph (3).

(B) If a recipient knowingly provides their electronic benefits transfer card number and personal identification number to an unauthorized third party that the recipient mistakenly believes to be the contracted electronic benefits transfer vendor, an approved retailer, or a governmental entity, any benefits taken as described in subparagraph (A) shall be promptly replaced in accordance with the protocol established by the department pursuant to paragraph (3), but not more than one time in a 36-month period.

(3) The State Department of Social Services shall establish a protocol for recipients to report electronic theft of cash benefits that minimizes the burden on recipients, ensures prompt replacement of
 benefits in order to minimize the harm to recipients, and ensures program integrity. This protocol may include the automatic replacement of benefits without the need for recipient reporting and verification.

(4) (A) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2) and (3), the State Department of Social Services may issue mass reimbursements to recipients for the loss of cash benefits if the department finds that the benefits of multiple recipients were taken by an unauthorized withdrawal, removal, or use of benefits in which the recipients’ electronic benefits transfer card numbers or personal identification numbers were obtained by means of a data breach.

(B) A mass reimbursement made pursuant to subparagraph (A) requires the approval of the Department of Finance with notice given to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(5) (A) Notwithstanding any other law or guidance, and except as provided in this paragraph, a recipient shall not incur any loss of nutrition benefits taken by an unauthorized contact, withdrawal, removal, or use of the benefits, including, but not limited to, use that results from an unauthorized solicitation, request, or representation that does not occur by the use of a physical electronic benefits transfer card issued to the recipient or authorized third party to directly access the benefits.

(B) The State Department of Social Services shall establish a protocol to use state funds to replace nutrition benefits taken as described in subparagraph (A) in accordance with the following limitations:

(i) A maximum of two months’ worth of benefits shall be replaced at one time.

(ii) A
 household shall not receive more than two replacements per federal fiscal year.

(iii) A household shall have 90 days from the date of theft to request replacement of the electronically stolen benefits.

(C) If, at any time, a federally funded replacement is available for any nutrition benefit listed in subparagraph (D), this paragraph shall be inoperative with regard to that specific benefit.

(D) For the purposes of this section, “nutrition benefits” means CalFresh, Disaster CalFresh, and benefits previously replaced due to household misfortune under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of, and California Food Assistance Program (CFAP) nutrition benefits under Chapter 10.1 (commencing with Section 18930) of, Part 6.

(E) A county shall replace eligible, electronically stolen benefits as soon as administratively feasible, but no more than 10 business days following the receipt of the replacement request. A county shall prioritize the replacement of electronically stolen nutrition benefits in accordance with Sections 10000 and 18900.

(6) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific the requirements and protocols described in paragraphs (2), (3), and (5) by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions from the department until regulations are adopted. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations until the adoption of regulations, which shall occur no later than June 30, 2030.

(j) Electronic benefits transfer system consumers shall be informed on how to use electronic benefits transfer cards, how to protect their cards from misuse, and where consumers can use their cards to withdraw benefits without
 incurring a fee, charge, or surcharge.

(k) The electronic benefits transfer system shall be designed to inform recipients when the electronic benefits transfer system does not function or is expected not to function for more than a one-hour period between 6 a.m. and midnight during any 24-hour period. This information shall be made available in the recipient’s preferred language if the electronic benefits transfer system vendor contract provides for services in that language.

(l) Procedures shall be developed for error resolution.

(m) A fee shall not be charged by the state, a county, or an electronic benefits processor certified by the state to retailers participating in the electronic benefits transfer system.

(n) Except for CalFresh
 transactions, a recipient may be charged a fee, not to exceed the amount allowed by applicable state and federal law and customarily charged to other customers, for cash withdrawal transactions that exceed four per month.

(o) The electronic benefits transfer system shall be designed to ensure that recipients of benefits under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 have access to using or withdrawing benefits with minimal fees or charges, including an opportunity to access benefits with no fee or charges.

(p) A county shall exempt an individual from the three-day staggering requirement under subdivision (c) on a case-by-case basis for hardship. Hardship includes, but is not limited to, the incurrence of late charges on an individual’s housing payments.

(q) A county shall use information provided by the
 department to inform recipients of benefits under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of all of the following:

(1) The methods of electronic delivery of benefits available, including distribution of benefits through the electronic benefits transfer system or direct deposit pursuant to Section 11006.2.

(2) Applicable fees and charges, including surcharges, consumer and privacy protections, and liability for theft associated with the electronic benefits transfer system.

(3) How to avoid fees and charges, including opting for delivery of benefits by direct deposit and using the electronic benefits transfer card solely at surcharge free locations.

(4) Where to withdraw benefits without a surcharge when using the electronic benefits transfer
 system.

(5) That a recipient may authorize any available method of electronic delivery of benefits and instructions regarding how the recipient may select or change their preferred method of electronic delivery of benefits and that the recipient shall be given the opportunity to select the method prior to the first payment.

(6) That a recipient may be entitled to an alternative method of delivery if the recipient demonstrates an inability to use an electronic benefits transfer card or other aspect of the system because of disability, language, lack of access, or other barrier pursuant to subdivision (d) and instructions regarding how to determine whether the recipient qualifies for an alternative method of delivery.

(7) That a recipient may be entitled to an exemption from the three-day staggering requirement under
 subdivision (c) on a case-by-case basis for hardship pursuant to subdivision (p) and instructions regarding how to determine whether the recipient qualifies for the exemption.

(r) A county is in compliance with subdivision (q) if it provides the recipient a copy of the information developed by the department. A county may provide a recipient information, in addition to the copy of the information developed by the department, pursuant to subdivision (q), either verbally or in writing, if the county determines the additional information will benefit the recipient’s understanding of the information provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 26, Sec. 15.   (AB 152)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10072.1.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that flea markets, farmers’ markets, and certified farmers’ markets are important sources of low-cost produce for Californians in need of food assistance.

(b) (1) An interested collective group or association of produce sellers that is Food and Nutrition Service (FNS) authorized and actively participating in produce sales in a market described in subdivision (a) may initiate and operate
 an electronic benefit transfer (EBT) acceptance system on behalf of its members, to the extent and manner allowed by federal law and regulation. The market operator shall allow and accommodate the FNS-authorized group or association in a reasonable manner that aids in the creation, implementation, and operation of its EBT acceptance system. The allowance and accommodation by the market operator mandated by this section is limited solely to the activity of the operation of the EBT acceptance system by the group or association. No other activities are authorized without the express permission of the market operator.

(2) This subdivision shall not apply to a market described in subdivision (a) that currently or subsequently operates an EBT acceptance system.

(c) Nothing in this section or any other provision of law shall prohibit an individually FNS-authorized produce seller in a
 market described in subdivision (a) from operating his or her own individual EBT acceptance activity as part of that seller’s personal business customer transaction offering.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to require a market described in subdivision (a) to itself create, operate, or maintain an EBT acceptance system on behalf of its produce sellers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 435, Sec. 1.   (AB 537)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10072.2.

(a) The electronic benefits transfer system required by this chapter shall be designed to include a flexible benefit issuance mechanism.

(b) The flexible benefit issuance mechanism created under this section shall be designed in a manner that can target multiple populations with specific benefits and shall allow the department flexibility to provide benefits for specific populations, as determined by the department, contingent upon the appropriation of funds by the Legislature.

(c) (1) The distribution of benefits pursuant to the flexible benefit issuance mechanism created under this section shall comply with all federal and state laws and regulations
 governing electronic benefits.

(2) The distribution of benefits pursuant to the flexible benefit issuance mechanism created under this section shall comply with privacy and confidentiality procedures required by federal and state law.

(d) The flexible benefit issuance mechanism created under this section shall become operative within nine months of the date that the Department of Social Services certifies and publishes on the department’s Internet Web site that the third generation electronic benefits transfer system required by this chapter has otherwise been fully implemented.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 13.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10072.3.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Fruit and Vegetable EBT Pilot Project.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Authorized pilot retailer” means any retail establishment that is authorized to accept CalFresh benefits, including, but not limited to, grocery stores, corner stores, farmers’ markets, farm stands, and mobile markets.

(2) “Fresh fruits and vegetables” means any variety of whole or cut fruits and vegetables without added sugars, fats, oils, or salt and that have not been processed with heat, drying, canning, or freezing.

(3) “Supplemental benefits” means additional funds delivered to a CalFresh recipient’s EBT card upon purchase of fresh fruits and vegetables using CalFresh benefits, and to be redeemed only for purchases allowed under the CalFresh program at an authorized retailer.

(c) The department, in consultation with the Department of Food and Agriculture, county CalFresh administrators, and stakeholders with experience operating CalFresh nutrition incentive programs, shall include within the EBT system a supplemental benefits mechanism that allows an authorized pilot retailer to deliver and redeem supplemental benefits. The supplemental benefits mechanism shall be compatible with operational procedures at farmers’ markets with centralized point-of-sale terminals and at grocery stores with integrated point-of-sale terminals. The supplemental benefits mechanism shall ensure all of the
 following:

(1) Supplemental benefits can be transferable across any CalFresh program authorized retailer.

(2) Supplemental benefits can be accrued, tracked, and redeemed by CalFresh recipients in a seamless, integrated process through the EBT system.

(3) Supplemental benefits can only be accrued by CalFresh recipients through the purchase of fresh fruits and vegetables from an authorized pilot retailer.

(4) Supplemental benefits can only be redeemed to make eligible purchases under the CalFresh program from an authorized retailer.

(5) The supplemental benefits mechanism complies with all applicable state and federal laws governing procedures to ensure privacy and confidentiality.

(6) Authorized pilot retailers that use EBT-only point-of-sale terminals, such as farmers’ markets, and those that use integrated point-of-sale terminals, such as grocery stores, shall be able to integrate the new supplemental benefits mechanism into their existing systems, including the free state-issued hardware provided to certified farmers’ markets and farmers.

(7) The supplemental benefits mechanism provides a CalFresh benefits to supplemental benefits match ratio of at least 1:1.

(8) A CalFresh household may only accrue up to a limited amount of supplemental benefits, as determined by the department.

(9) There shall be no expiration date for use of supplemental benefits, but the benefits may be expunged in accordance with federal Supplemental
 Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) regulations.

(d) There is hereby created in the State Treasury the California Fruit and Vegetable EBT Grant Fund. The fund shall consist of moneys from state, federal, and other public and private sources to provide grants pursuant to subdivision (e).

(e) Upon the deposit of sufficient moneys into the California Fruit and Vegetable EBT Grant Fund, as determined by the department, and upon the appropriation of moneys from the fund by the Legislature for this purpose, the department shall provide grants for pilot projects to implement and test the supplemental benefits mechanism in existing retail settings. The goal of the pilot project is to develop and refine a scalable model for increasing the purchase and consumption of fresh fruits and vegetables by delivering supplemental benefits to CalFresh recipients in a way that can be easily adopted by
 authorized retailers of various types, sizes, and locations in the future. The department, in consultation with the Department of Food and Agriculture, shall develop and adopt guidelines for awarding the grants, which shall include, at a minimum, all of the following requirements:

(1) (A) A minimum of three grants shall be awarded to nonprofit organizations or government agencies.

(B) At least one of the grants shall provide the ability to test the supplemental benefit mechanism at farmers’ markets. A farmers’ market that operates a centralized point-of-sale terminal and a scrip system and that also participates as a pilot project pursuant to this section may disburse scrips for supplemental benefits and for fresh fruits and vegetables concurrently.

(2) Selection criteria shall require that
 grant applicants demonstrate all of the following:

(A) Previous experience and effectiveness in administering CalFresh nutrition incentive programs, or similar supplemental benefits programs.

(B) Partnership commitment from at least one existing authorized retailer that already accepts CalFresh benefits and sells fresh fruits and vegetables.

(C) Ability to ensure that supplemental benefits are only accrued and delivered when purchasing fresh fruits and vegetables with CalFresh benefits and will be used only to make purchases authorized under the CalFresh program.

(D) Status as a nonprofit organization or government agency.

(E) Ability to provide the minimum data deemed necessary for the
 department to successfully evaluate the pilot project, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(F) Any other criteria that the department deems necessary for successful pilot project implementation, such as the level of need in the community, the size of the CalFresh population, and the need for geographic diversity.

(3) Grantees shall be responsible for all of the following:

(A) Securing the commitment of at least one authorized retailer willing to participate in the pilot project.

(B) Conducting community outreach.

(C) Providing evaluation data to the department.

(D) Ensuring the integrity of the pilot project
 following guidelines adopted by the department pursuant to this subdivision.

(f) (1) The department shall evaluate the pilot projects that operated pursuant to this section between February 1, 2023, and January 31, 2025, and make recommendations to further refine and expand the supplemental benefits mechanism. These recommendations shall also include a strategy for CalFresh client education, developed in consultation with county CalFresh administrators and advocates. The evaluation shall examine the efficacy of supplemental benefits accrual, delivery, and redemption from the perspective of CalFresh recipients, participating retailers, and state administrators. The evaluation shall also provide recommendations for further modifications that would make the mechanism easier for CalFresh recipients to use, for a variety of authorized retailer types to adopt, and for the department to administer. The department may contract
 with an independent evaluator to conduct this evaluation.

(2) (A) The department shall provide information on the timing and steps that would be necessary to transition the pilot project to a supplemental benefits program that is fully state managed, without grantee intermediaries.

(B) The information to be submitted under this paragraph shall include both of the following:

(i) The results of the evaluation required pursuant to paragraph (1).

(ii) Scoping the staff or other resources and timelines for all of the following:

(I) Engaging with and enrolling interested retailers directly on an ongoing basis, if the state makes additional funding available for further
 expansion.

(II) The staffing and technical resources needed by the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration to certify new retailers’ EBT systems when they are onboarded into the program.

(III) Resources needed to align the EBT system and the California Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) to fully automate financial reconciliation of fruit and vegetable supplemental benefits as the program expands.

(IV) Expansion to include online CalFresh transactions and grocery delivery services.

(3) (A) By July 1, 2025, the department shall submit a report to the Legislature on the topics described by paragraphs (1) and (2).

(B) The report submitted pursuant to
 subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, all of the following apply for the purposes of this section:
